Wisconsin, session 2025, SB642.
do enact as follows:SB642,11Section 1. 16.265 of the statutes is created to read:SB642,2,11216.265 Landlord fire prevention grant program. (1) The department 3shall establish and administer a program to award grants to landlords of 4residential buildings for the purpose of implementing fire prevention and 5suppression measures, including installing fire sprinklers in a residential building 6and providing fire extinguishers in residential units. The department shall 7establish application procedures for, and the terms and conditions of, receiving a 8grant under this subsection. The department shall award grants on a first-come, 9first-served basis to eligible landlords. A grant awarded under this subsection may 10not exceed 50 percent of the costs incurred by the landlord for the fire prevention 11and suppression measures.SB642,2,1412(2) The department shall make grants under sub. (1) from the appropriation 13under s. 20.505 (1) (ft). The total amount of all grants awarded under sub. (1) may 14not exceed $10,000,000.SB642,2,1715(3) The department shall promulgate rules for administering the program 16under this section, including rules establishing eligibility criteria for receiving a 17grant under sub. (1).SB642,218Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 19insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB642,33Section 3. 20.505 (1) (ft) of the statutes is created to read:SB642,3,6420.505 (1) (ft) Landlord fire prevention grant program. As a continuing 5appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the landlord fire prevention grant 6program under s. 16.265.SB642,3,77